District of Columbia statutes.
7-153

Appointment of Director.

The Department of Public Health shall be under the supervision and direction of a Director who shall be appointed by the Mayor in accordance with subchapter X of Chapter 6 of Title 1, and subject to the advice and consent of the Council, as provided in § 1-523.01.

Mar. 13, 1992, D.C. Law 9-182, § 4, 39 DCR 8203
1981 Ed., § 6-133.